New Jersey, session 221, S3707.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 2 of P.L.1995, c.328 (C.26:2-137.3) is amended to read as follows: 2.    As used in this act: "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Health. "Department" means the Department of Health. "Elevated blood lead level" means a level of lead in the bloodstream that equals or exceeds [five] 3.5 micrograms per deciliter or other such amount as may be identified in the most recent recommendations from the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, and that necessitates the undertaking of responsive action. "Lead poisoning" means the poisoning of the bloodstream that results from prolonged exposure to lead or lead-based substances in water, paint, building materials, or the environment, and which causes uncorrectable developmental delay and decreased mental functioning capacity in children, and in severe cases, can lead to a child's premature death. "Lead screening" means the application of a detection technique to measure a child's blood lead level and determine the extent of a child's recent exposure to lead. (cf: P.L.2017, c.7, s.4) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.